District of Columbia statutes.
20-104

Presumption.

Unless otherwise expressly provided, whenever this title states that a fact shall be presumed, the presumption is rebuttable.

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155
1981 Ed., § 20-104.